Hawaii statutes.
§486-7 Specific powers and duties of the
board; rules. (a) The board shall adopt reasonable rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for the enforcement of this chapter. These rules shall have the
force and effect of law and shall govern the use or application of measurement
standards, measures, and measuring transactions in the State.

(b) These rules may include:

(1) Standards of net measure, and reasonable
standards of fill for any package;

(2) The technical and reporting procedures to be
followed, the report and record forms to be used by persons subject to the
provisions of this chapter, and the marks of approval and rejection to be used
by the administrator, inspectors, and measurement standards personnel in the
discharge of their official duties;

(3) Exemptions from the sealing, labeling, marking,
or other requirements of the respective parts of this chapter;

(4) The voluntary registration of service persons and
service agencies for commercial weighing and measuring devices. These rules
may include, but are not limited to, provisions for registration fees, period
of registration, requirements for test equipment, privileges and
responsibilities of a voluntary registrant, reports required, qualification
requirements, examinations to be administered, certificates of registration,
and means for revocation of registration;

(5) Schedules and fees for licensing measuring
devices;

(6) Schedules and fees for calibrating or testing
measurement standards, and registration of the products covered by such
measurement standards;

(7) Specifications, tolerances, and other technical
requirements with respect to the packaging, registering, handling, storing,
advertising, labeling, dispensing, and selling of petroleum products;

(8) Specifications, tolerances, and other technical
requirements for weighing and measuring devices;

(9) Practices to assure that amounts of commodities
or services sold are determined in accordance with good commercial practice and
are so determined and represented as to be accurate and informative to all
parties at interest;

(10) Requirements for type evaluation;

(11) Definitions, applicability, use, units,
standards, and tolerances relating to the International System of Units; and

(12) Such other rules as the board deems necessary for
the enforcement of this chapter.

(c) These rules shall include specifications,
tolerances, and other technical requirements designed to eliminate from use
those measures and measurement standards:

(1) That are not accurate;

(2) That are of such construction that they are
faulty, that is, that are not reasonably permanent in their adjustment or will
not repeat their indications correctly; or

(3) That facilitate the perpetration of fraud.

(d) The specifications, tolerances, and other
technical requirements for measuring devices and the uniform laws and
regulations as adopted by the National Conference on Weights and Measures,
recommended and published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology
and adopted, or amended and adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 91, shall
be the basis for measurement standards in the State. In addition, the board,
pursuant to chapter 91, may adopt or amend and adopt any other measurement
standard established by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, the
American Society for Testing and Materials, the American National Standards
Institute, the International Organization of Legal Metrology, the International
Bureau of Weights and Measures, and the Society of Automotive Engineers, among
others. [L 1988, c 156, pt of §3; am L 1991, c 153, §12; am L 1993, c 54, §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next